Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,167
Conflicting provisions; how construed.

To the extent that any provision of the Nebraska Housing Agency Act shall conflict with any provision of law not contained in the act, the act shall prevail with respect to local housing agencies. It is the intention of the Legislature that, with respect to any subject matter covered by the act, the provisions of the act shall preempt all other laws of this state with respect to the formation, powers, and operation of local housing agencies and the requirements of law applicable thereto.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 96.